ru: Электроника > Видеоаппаратура: Компьютерные мониторы; Интерактивные дисплеи и доски; Проекторы; Спутниковое и кабельное телевидение; Телевизоры; Аксессуары для видеоаппаратуры; Аппаратура для видеомонтажа и видеопроизводства; Видеомультиплексоры; Устройства для воспроизведения и записи видео; Видеосерверы; Видеопередатчики; Панели и комплекты для видеостен
sk-SK: Elektronika > Video zariadenia: Počítačové monitory; Interaktívne displeje a tabule; Projektory; Satelitná a káblová TV; Televízory; Video príslušenstvo; Hardvér a výrobné vybavenie na úpravu videa; Video multiplexory; Video prehrávače a rekordéry; Video servery; Video vysielače; Videosteny a balíky
tr: Elektronik > Video: Bilgisayar Monitörleri; İnteraktif Ekranlar ve Beyaz Tahtalar; Projeksiyon Cihazları; Uydu ve Kablo TV; Televizyonlar; Video Aksesuarları; Video Montaj Donanımı ve Prodüksiyon Ekipmanları; Video Çoklayıcılar; Video Oynatıcılar ve Kaydediciler; Video Sunucuları; Video Vericileri; Video Duvar Ekranları ve Paketleri
en: Electronics > Video: Computer Monitors; Interactive Displays & Whiteboards; Projectors; Satellite & Cable TV; Televisions; Video Accessories; Video Editing Hardware & Production Equipment; Video Multiplexers; Video Players & Recorders; Video Servers; Video Transmitters; Video Wall Displays & Packages
ja: 電子機器 > ビデオ: PCモニター; インタラクティブディスプレイとホワイトボード; プロジェクター; 衛星放送・ケーブルテレビ; テレビ; 映像機器関連用品; 映像編集・制作機器; ビデオマルチプレクサ; 録画・再生機器; ビデオサーバー; ビデオトランスミッター; ビデオウォールディスプレイとパッケージ
ro-RO: Electronice > Video: Monitoare pentru calculatoare; Ecrane interactive și table interactive; Proiectoare; TV prin satelit și cablu; Televizoare; Accesorii video; Echipamente de editare video și echipamente de producție; Multiplexoare video; Aparate de redare și de înregistrare video; Servere video; Transmițătoare video; Ecrane și pachete pentru perete video
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Vídeo: Monitores de computador; Ecrãs interativos e quadros brancos; Projetores; TV por cabo e satélite; Televisões; Acessórios vídeo; Equipamento de produção e de edição de vídeo; Multiplexadores de vídeo; Leitores e gravadores de vídeo; Servidores vídeo; Transmissores vídeo; Ecrãs e pacotes de parede de vídeo
pl: Elektronika > Video: Monitory komputerowe; Wyświetlacze interaktywne i tablice; Projektory; Telewizja satelitarna i kablowa; Telewizory; Akcesoria do wideo; Sprzęt do edycji i produkcji filmów; Multipleksery wideo; Odtwarzacze i nagrywarki wideo; Serwery wideo; Transmitery wideo; Wyświetlacze ścian wideo i pakiety
de: Elektronik > Video: Computermonitore; Interaktive Displays und Whiteboards; Projektoren; Satelliten- & Kabelfernsehen; Fernseher; Videozubehör; Videobearbeitungshardware & Videoproduktionsausrüstung; Video-Multiplexer; Videoabspielgeräte & -rekorder; Videoserver; Videotransmitter; Videowand-Displays und -Pakete
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Vídeo: Monitores de computador; Displays e lousas interativas; Projetores; Satélite e TV a cabo; Televisões; Acessórios para vídeo; Hardware de edição e equipamentos de produção de vídeo; Multiplexadores de vídeo; Gravadores e players de vídeo; Servidores de vídeo; Transmissores AV; Displays e pacotes para parede de vídeo
bg-BG: Електроника > Видео: Компютърни монитори; Интерактивни дисплеи и бели дъски; Проектори; Сателитна и кабелна телевизия; Телевизори; Видео аксесоари; Устройства за видеомонтаж и оборудване за видеопродукция; Видео мултиплексори; Устройства за възпроизвеждане и запис на видео; Видео сървъри; Видео предаватели; Дисплеи и пакети за видео стени
cs: Elektronika > Video: Počítačové monitory; Interaktivní displeje a tabule; Projektory; Satelitní a kabelové televize; Televize; Videopříslušenství; Vybavení pro střih a produkci videa; Multiplexory videa; Videopřehrávače a rekordéry; Videoservery; Zařízení pro přenos videa; Displeje a balíčky videostěn
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Βίντεο: Οθόνες υπολογιστών; Διαδραστικές οθόνες & πίνακες; Μηχανές προβολής; Δορυφορική & καλωδιακή τηλεόραση; Τηλεοράσεις; Αξεσουάρ βίντεο; Εξοπλισμός υλικού επεξεργασίας & παραγωγής βίντεο; Πολυπλέκτες βίντεο; Συσκευές αναπαραγωγής και εγγραφής βίντεο; Διακομιστές βίντεο; Πομποί βίντεο; Οθόνες & πακέτα video wall
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Video: Màn hình máy tính; Màn hình tương tác và bảng trắng; Máy chiếu; Truyền hình cáp và truyền hình vệ tinh; Tivi; Phụ kiện hình ảnh; Thiết bị sản xuất & Phần mềm chỉnh sửa video; Bộ trộn kênh video; Đầu ghi và phát video; Máy chủ video; Thiết bị truyền tín hiệu video; Màn hình và gói video tường
nb: Elektronikk > Video: Datamonitorer; Interaktive skjermer og tavler; Projektorer; Satellitt- og kabel-TV; TV-er; Videotilbehør; Maskinvare for videoredigering og produksjonsutstyr; Video-multipleksere; Videospillere og -opptakere; Videoservere; Videosendere; Videovegg-skjermer og pakker
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > วิดีโอ: จอคอมพิวเตอร์; จอแสดงผลและกระดานไวท์บอร์ดอินเทอร์แอคทีฟ; โปรเจคเตอร์; ดาวเทียมและเคเบิล TV; ทีวี; อุปกรณ์วิดีโอ; ฮาร์ดแวร์ตัดต่อวิดีโอและอุปกรณ์การผลิต; อุปกรณ์รวมส่งสัญญาณวิดีโอ; เครื่องเล่นและบันทึกวิดีโอ; เซิร์ฟเวอร์วิดีโอ; เครื่องส่งสัญญาณวิดีโอ; จอแสดงผลและชุดวิดีโอวอลล์
ko: 전자기기 > 비디오: 컴퓨터 모니터; 인터랙티브 디스플레이 및 화이트보드; 프로젝터; 위성/케이블 TV; 텔레비전; 비디오 부대용품; 동영상 편집 하드웨어/제작 장비; 비디오 멀티플렉서; 비디오 플레이어/녹화기; 비디오 서버; 비디오 송신기; 비디오 월 디스플레이 및 패키지
da: Elektronik > Video: Computerskærme; Interaktive displays og whiteboards; Projektorer; Satellit- og kabel-tv; Tv; Video – tilbehør; Videoredigering – hardware og produktion; Video – multipleksere; Videoafspillere og -optagere; Videoservere; Videosendeapparater; Videovægsdisplays og -pakker
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 视频: 电脑显示器; 交互式显示器和白板; 投影仪/幻灯机; 卫星电视与有线电视; 电视; 摄影摄像配件; 视频编辑硬件与制作设备; 视频复用器; 视频播放与录制设备; 视频服务器; 视频发射器; 视频墙显示器和套装
hu: Elektronika > Videó: Számítógép-monitorok; Interaktív kijelzők és táblák; Projektorok; Műholdas és kábel TV; Televíziók; Videókiegészítők; Videószerkesztő hardver és gyártóberendezések; Videó multiplexerek; Videólejátszók és -felvevők; Videószerverek; Videóadók; Videófal-kijelzők és -csomagok
fi: Elektroniikka > Video: Tietokonemonitorit; Vuorovaikutteinen näyttö ja valkotaulu; Projektorit; Satelliitti- ja kaapeli-TV; Televisiot; Videotarvikkeet; Videoeditointilaitteet ja tuotantovälineet; Videon multiplekserit; Videonauhurit; Videoserverit; Videolähettimet; Videoseinänäyttö ja paketti
hr-HR: Elektronika > Video: Računalni monitori; Interaktivni zasloni i bijele ploče; Projektori; Satelitska i kabelska TV; Televizije; Videopribor; Hardver za video uređivanje i oprema za produkciju; Video multiplekseri; Video playeri i rekorderi; Videoposlužitelji; Videoodašiljači; Zasloni i paketi za videozid
fr: Appareil électronique > Vidéo: Écrans d’ordinateur; Écrans interactifs et tableaux blancs; Vidéoprojecteurs; Télévision par câble et par satellite; Téléviseurs; Accessoires vidéo; Matériel de montage et de production vidéo; Multiplexeurs vidéo; Lecteurs et enregistreurs vidéo; Serveurs vidéo; Transmetteurs vidéo; Écrans et ensembles pour murs vidéo
es: Electrónica > Video: Monitores de computadora; Pantallas interactivas y pizarras; Proyectores; Televisión por cable y satélite; Televisores; Accesorios de vídeo; Equipo de producción y hardware de edición de vídeo; Multiplexores de vídeo; Grabadores y reproductores de vídeo; Servidores de vídeo; Transmisores de vídeo; Pantallas y kits de videowall
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 視訊/影音: 電腦螢幕; 互動式顯示器及白板; 投影機; 衛星和有線電視; 電視; 視訊配件; 影視編輯製作硬體設備; 視訊多工器; 錄放影機; 影像伺服器; 視訊發射器; 影片牆顯示器及套件
lt-LT: Elektronika > Vaizdo įranga: Kompiuterių monitoriai; Interaktyvūs ekranai ir lentos; Projektoriai; Palydovinė ir kabelinė televizija; Televizoriai; Vaizdo įrangos priedai; Vaizdo įrašų redagavimo aparatinė ir gamybos įranga; Vaizdo multiplekseriai; Vaizdo grotuvai ir įrašymo įrenginiai; Vaizdo serveriai; Vaizdo siųstuvai; Vaizdo sienų ekranai ir paketai
sl-SI: Elektronika > Video: Računalniški zasloni; Interaktivni zasloni in table; Projektorji; Satelitska in kabelska televizija; Televizorji; Video dodatki; Oprema za video montažo in produkcijska oprema; Video multiplekserji; Video predvajalniki in snemalniki; Video strežniki; Video oddajniki; Videostenski zasloni in kompleti
sv: Elektronik > Video: Datorskärmar; Interaktiva skärmar och whiteboards; Projektorer; Satellit- och kabel-TV; TV-apparater; Videotillbehör; Maskinvara för videoredigering och produktionsutrustning; Videomultiplexer; Videospelare och videoinspelningsutrustning; Videoservrar; Videosändare/mottagare; Videoväggsskärmar och -paket
it: Elettronica > Video: Monitor per computer; Display interattivi e lavagne; Proiettori; TV satellitare e via cavo; Televisori; Accessori video; Apparecchi montaggio video e produzione; Multiplexer video; Videoriproduttori/registratori; Server video; Videotrasmettitori; Display e pacchetti per video wall
nl: Elektronica > Video: Computerbeeldschermen; Interactieve displays en whiteboards; Projectoren; Satelliet- en kabel-TV; Televisies; Videoaccessoires; Hardware voor videobewerking en productieapparatuur; Videomultiplexers; Videospelers en -recorders; Videoservers; Videotransmitters; Videowalldisplays en pakketten